pl: Kompatybilność z aparatem dentystycznym: Nakładki prostujące; Aparat ortodontyczny; Czapeczki; Korony; Protezy; Implanty; Szyny nocne; Brak; Nie dotyczy; Retencja; Licówki; Inne
sl-SI: Združljivost zobnega pripomočka: Poravnalniki; Zobni aparat; Kapice; Kronke; Zobne proteze; Vsadki; Nočni ščitniki; Brez; Ni uporabno; Retainerji; Fasete; Drugo
ro-RO: Compatibilitate aparate dentare: Aliniere dentare; Aparat dentar; Capace; Coroane; Proteze dentare; Implanturi; Gutiere de noapte; Niciuna; Nu se aplică; Contenții; Fațete; Altele
fr: Compatibilité avec les appareils dentaires: Gouttières d'alignement; Appareils dentaires; Casquettes; Couronnes; Prothèses dentaires; Implants; Protecteurs de nuit; Aucune; Non applicable; Appareils de rétention; Facettes; Autre
tr: Diş apareyi uyumluluğu: Hizalayıcılar; Diş telleri; Kapaklar; Kronlar; Protez Dişler; İmplantlar; Gece koruyucular; Hiçbiri; Geçerli değil; Pekiştirme apareyleri; Venerler; Diğer
th: ความเข้ากันได้ของเครื่องมือทันตกรรม: เครื่องมือจัดฟัน; จัดฟัน; หมวก; ครอบฟัน; ฟันปลอม; รากฟันเทียม; เฝือกสบฟันกลางคืน; ไม่มี; ไม่สามารถใช้ได้; รีเทนเนอร์; วีเนียร์; อื่นๆ
it: Compatibilità con apparecchi dentali: Allineatori; Apparecchio ortodontico; Cappelli; Corone; Dentiere; Impianti; Protezioni notturne; Nessuna; Non applicabile; Retainer; Faccette; Altro
zh-CN: 牙科器具兼容性: 矫正器; 牙套; 纪念帽; 牙冠; 假牙; 种植牙; 夜间护齿器; 无; 不适用; 保持器; 贴面; 其他
pt-BR: Compatibilidade com aparelhos dentários: Alinhadores; Aparelho ortodôntico; Bonés; Coroas; Dentaduras; Implantes; Protetores noturnos; Nenhum; Não aplicável; Contenções; Facetas; Outro
ko: 치과 기구 호환성: 얼라이너; 교정기; 모자; 크라운; 틀니; 임플란트; 나이트 가드; 없음; 해당 없음; 리테이너; 베니어; 기타
cs: Kompatibilita zubního zařízení: Rovnátka; Rovnátka pevná; Fanouškovské čepice; Korunky; Umělý chrup; Implantáty; Noční chrániče; Žádný; Není relevantní; Retenční aparáty; Fazety; Jiné
de: Zahnspangen-Kompatibilität: Aligner; Zahnspangen; Kappen; Kronen; Zahnersatz; Implantate; Nachtschienen; Keine; Nicht zutreffend; Retainer; Veneers; Sonstiges
da: Tandudstyrskompatibilitet: Tandstillere; Bøjle; Kasketter; Kroner; Proteser; Implantater; Natskinner; Ingen; Ikke relevant; Retentionsskinner; Facader; Andet
en: Dental appliance compatibility: Aligners; Braces; Caps; Crowns; Dentures; Implants; Night guards; None; Not applicable; Retainers; Veneers; Other
vi: Khả năng tương thích dụng cụ nha khoa: Khay niềng trong; Niềng răng; Mũ; Mão răng; Răng giả; Cấy ghép; Bảo vệ ban đêm; Không có; Không áp dụng; Hàm duy trì; Răng sứ; Khác
es: Compatibilidad con aparatos dentales: Alineadores; Brackets; Tapones; Coronas; Dentaduras postizas; Implantes; Protectores nocturnos; Ninguno; No aplicable; Retenedores; Carillas; Otros
bg-BG: Съвместимост с дентални уреди: Алайнери; Брекети; Капачки; Коронки; Зъбни протези; Импланти; Нощни шини; Няма; Не е приложимо; Ретейнери; Фасети; Други
nl: Compatibiliteit tandheelkundige apparatuur: Aligners; Beugel; Petten; Kronen; Kunstgebitten; Implantaten; Nachtbeugels; Geen; Niet van toepassing; Retainers; Facings; Andere
ja: 歯科器具適合性: アライナー; ブレース; キャップ; クラウン; 義歯・入れ歯; インプラント; ナイトガード; なし; 適用できない; リテーナー; ベニア; その他
zh-TW: 牙科器具相容性: 隱形矯正器; 牙套; 便帽; 牙冠; 假牙; 植牙; 夜間護牙器; 無; 不適用; 維持器; 貼片; 其他
pt-PT: Compatibilidade com aparelhos dentários: Alinhadores; Aparelho ortodôntico; Bonés; Coroas; Dentaduras; Implantes; Protetores noturnos; Nenhum; Não aplicável; Aparelhos de contenção; Facetas; Outro
ru: Совместимость стоматологических приспособлений: Элайнеры; Брекеты; Заглушки с внутренней резьбой; Коронки; Зубные протезы; Имплантаты; Ночные капы; Нет; Неприменимо; Ретейнеры; Виниры; Другой
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost dentalnog aparata: Aligneri; Aparatić; Poklopci za cijevi; Krunice; Zubne proteze; Implantati; Noćni štitnici; Nema; Nije primjenjivo; Retaineri; Ljuskice; Ostalo
fi: Hammaslääkinnällisen laitteen yhteensopivuus: Oikomislaitteet; Hammasraudat; Lippalakit; Kruunut; Hammasproteesit; Implantit; Yösuojat; Ei mitään; Ei sovelleta; Retentiolaitteet; Laminaatit; Muu
nb: Tannhjelpemiddelkompatibilitet: Alignere; Tannregulering; Capser; Kroner; Gebiss; Implantater; Nattbeskyttere; Ingen; Ikke relevant; Retainere; Fasetter; Annet
el: Συμβατότητα οδοντιατρικής συσκευής: Ευθυγραμμιστές; Σιδεράκια; Καπέλα (Caps); Στέμματα; Οδοντοστοιχίες; Εμφυτεύματα; Νυχτερινοί νάρθηκες; Καμία; Δεν ισχύει; Συγκρατητήρες; Όψεις; Άλλο
sk-SK: Kompatibilita zubných pomôcok: Zarovnávače; Strojčeky; Uzávery; Korunky; Zubné protézy; Implantáty; Nočné chrániče; Žiadny; Nevzťahuje sa; Retenčné aparáty; Fazety; Iné
hu: Fogászatieszköz-kompatibilitás: Fogszabályozó sínek; Fogszabályozó; Sapkák; Koronák; Fogsorok; Implantátumok; Éjszakai fogvédő; Egyik sem; Nem alkalmazható; Fenntartó készülék; Héjak; Egyéb
sv: Tandapparatkompatibilitet: Aligners; Tandställning; Kepsar; Kronor; Tandproteser; Implantat; Nattskydd; Inga; Ej tillämpligt; Retainers; Fasader; Övrigt
lt-LT: Dantų aparatų suderinamumas: Kapos; Breketai; Dangteliai; Karūnėlės; Dantų protezai; Implantai; Naktinės kapos; Nėra; Netaikoma; Retaineriai; Laminatės; Kita